Illinois, session 104th, SB2430.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act is 5amended by changing Sections 2 and 3 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 145/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481b.32)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires: 9    (1) "Hotel" means any building or buildings in which the 10public may, for a consideration, obtain living quarters, 11sleeping or housekeeping accommodations. The term includes, 12but is not limited to, inns, motels, tourist homes or courts, 13lodging houses, rooming houses and apartment houses, retreat 14centers, conference centers, and hunting lodges. For the 15purposes of re-renters of hotel rooms only, "hotel" does not 16include a short-term rental. 17    (2) "Operator" means any person engaged in the business of 18renting, leasing, or letting rooms in a hotel. 19    (3) "Occupancy" means the use or possession, or the right 20to the use or possession, of any room or rooms in a hotel for 21any purpose, or the right to the use or possession of the 22furnishings or to the services and accommodations accompanying 23the use and possession of the room or rooms.  SB2430- 2 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1    (4) "Room" or "rooms" means any living quarters, sleeping 2or housekeeping accommodations.3    (5) "Permanent resident" means any person who occupied or 4has the right to occupy any room or rooms, regardless of 5whether or not it is the same room or rooms, in a hotel for at 6least 30 consecutive days.7    (6) "Rent" or "rental" means the consideration received 8for occupancy, valued in money, whether received in money or 9otherwise, including all receipts, cash, credits, and property 10or services of any kind or nature. "Rent" or "rental" includes 11any fee, charge, or commission received from a guest by a 12re-renter of hotel rooms specifically in connection with the 13re-rental of hotel rooms, but does not include any fee, 14charge, or commission received from a short-term rental by a 15hosting platform. 16    (7) "Department" means the Department of Revenue.17    (8) "Person" means any natural individual, firm, 18partnership, association, joint stock company, joint 19adventure, public or private corporation, limited liability 20company, or a receiver, executor, trustee, guardian, or other 21representative appointed by order of any court.22    (9) "Re-renter of hotel rooms" means a person who is not 23employed by the hotel operator but who, either directly or 24indirectly, through agreements or arrangements with third 25parties, collects or processes the payment of rent for a hotel 26room located in this State and (i) obtains the right or   SB2430- 3 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1authority to grant control of, access to, or occupancy of a 2hotel room in this State to a guest of the hotel or (ii) 3facilitates the booking of a hotel room located in this State. 4A person who obtains those rights or authorities is not 5considered a re-renter of a hotel room if the person operates 6under a shared hotel brand with the operator. 7    (10) "Hosting platform" or "platform" means a person who 8provides an online application, software, website, or system 9through which a short-term rental located in this State is 10advertised or held out to the public as available to rent for 11occupancy. For purposes of this definition, "short-term 12rental" means an owner-occupied, tenant-occupied, or 13non-owner-occupied dwelling, including, but not limited to, an 14apartment, house, cottage, or condominium, located in this 15State, where: (i) at least one room in the dwelling is rented 16to an occupant for a period of less than 30 consecutive days; 17and (ii) all accommodations are reserved in advance; provided, 18however, that a dwelling shall be considered a single room if 19rented as such. 20    (11) "Shared hotel brand" means an identifying trademark 21that a hotel operator is expressly licensed to operate under 22in accordance with the terms of a hotel franchise or 23management agreement. 24    (12) "Residential dwelling" means a cabin, house, or 25structure used or designed to be used as an abode or home of a 26person, family, or household, and includes a single-family   SB2430- 4 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1dwelling, a portion of a single-family dwelling, or an 2individual residential dwelling in a multidwelling building, 3such as an apartment building, condominium, cooperative, or 4timeshare. 5    (13) "Short-term rental" means means a residential 6dwelling that is rented wholly or partially for a fee for a 7period of less than 30 continuous days. 8    (14) "Short-term rental marketplace" means any person or 9entity that provides a platform for compensation through which 10a third party offers to rent a short-term rental to an 11occupant. 12    (15) "Short-term rental unit provider" means any person or 13entity engaged in renting any short-term rental offered 14through a short-term rental marketplace. 15(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 7-1-24; revised 10-21-24.) 16    (35 ILCS 145/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481b.33)17    Sec. 3. Rate; exemptions. 18    (a) A tax is imposed upon hotel operators at the rate of 5% 19of 94% of the gross rental receipts from engaging in business 20as a hotel operator, excluding, however, from gross rental 21receipts, the proceeds of renting, leasing or letting hotel 22rooms to permanent residents of a hotel and proceeds from the 23tax imposed under subsection (c) of Section 13 of the 24Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority Act.25    (b) There shall be imposed an additional tax upon hotel   SB2430- 5 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1operators at the rate of 1% of 94% of the gross rental receipts 2received by the hotel operator from engaging in business as a 3hotel operator, excluding, however, from gross rental 4receipts, the proceeds of such renting, leasing or letting to 5permanent residents of that hotel and proceeds from the tax 6imposed under subsection (c) of Section 13 of the Metropolitan 7Pier and Exposition Authority Act.8    (b-5) Beginning on July 1, 2024, if the renting, leasing, 9or letting of a hotel room is done through a re-renter of hotel 10rooms, then, subject to the provisions of Sections 3-2 and 113-3, the re-renter is the hotel operator for the purposes of 12the taxes under subsections (a) and (b). If the re-renter is 13headquartered outside of this State and has no presence in 14this State other than its business as a re-renter, conducted 15remotely, then, subject to the provisions of Sections 3-2 and 163-3, such re-renter is the hotel operator for the purposes of 17the taxes under subsections (a) and (b) if it meets one of the 18following thresholds: 19        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from rentals in 20    Illinois by the re-renter of hotel rooms are $100,000 or 21    more; or 22        (2) the re-renter of hotel rooms cumulatively enters 23    into 200 or more separate transactions for rentals in 24    Illinois. 25    A re-renter of hotel rooms who is headquartered outside of 26this State and has no presence in this State other than its   SB2430- 6 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1business as a re-renter, conducted remotely, shall determine 2on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of March, June, 3September, and December, whether he or she meets the threshold 4of either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection (b-5) for the 5preceding 12-month period. If such re-renter of hotel rooms 6meets the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) for a 712-month period, he or she is subject to tax under this Act and 8is required to remit the tax imposed under this Act and file 9returns for the 12-month period beginning on the first day of 10the next month after he or she determines that he or she meets 11the threshold of paragraph (1) or (2). At the end of that 1212-month period, such re-renter of hotel rooms shall determine 13whether he or she continued to meet the threshold of either 14paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period. If 15he or she met the threshold in either paragraph (1) or (2) for 16the preceding 12-month period, he or she is a hotel operator in 17this State and is required to remit the tax imposed under this 18Act and file returns for the subsequent 12-month period. If, 19at the end of a 12-month period during which such re-renter is 20required to remit the tax imposed under this Act, the 21re-renter determines that he or she did not meet the threshold 22in either paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month 23period, he or she shall subsequently determine on a quarterly 24basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 25December, whether he or she meets the threshold of either 26paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period.   SB2430- 7 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1    (b-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 2beginning on January 2026, the tax under this Act is also 3imposed on short-term rentals. The tax shall be paid by the 4short-term rental unit provider, unless the short-term rental 5is secured through a short-term rental marketplace that meets 6the threshold set forth in this subsection. If the short-term 7rental is secured through a short-term rental marketplace that 8meets the threshold set forth in this subsection, then the 9short-term rental marketplace shall collect and remit the tax 10under this Act. The short-term rental marketplace shall 11collect and remit the tax under this Act if: 12        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from rentals in 13    Illinois by the short-term rental marketplace is $100,000 14    or more; or 15        (2) the short-term rental marketplace cumulatively 16    enters into 200 or more separate transactions for 17    short-term rentals in Illinois. 18    (c) No funds received pursuant to this Act shall be used to 19advertise for or otherwise promote new competition in the 20hotel business.21    (d) However, such tax is not imposed upon the privilege of 22engaging in any business in Interstate Commerce or otherwise, 23which business may not, under the Constitution and Statutes of 24the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this 25State. In addition, the tax is not imposed upon gross rental 26receipts for which the hotel operator is prohibited from   SB2430- 8 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1obtaining reimbursement for the tax from the customer by 2reason of a federal treaty.3    (d-5) On and after July 1, 2017, the tax imposed by this 4Act shall not apply to gross rental receipts received by an 5entity that is organized and operated exclusively for 6religious purposes and possesses an active Exemption 7Identification Number issued by the Department pursuant to the 8Retailers' Occupation Tax Act when acting as a hotel operator 9renting, leasing, or letting rooms: 10        (1) in furtherance of the purposes for which it is 11    organized; or 12        (2) to entities that (i) are organized and operated 13    exclusively for religious purposes, (ii) possess an active 14    Exemption Identification Number issued by the Department 15    pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and (iii) 16    rent the rooms in furtherance of the purposes for which 17    they are organized. 18    No gross rental receipts are exempt under paragraph (2) of 19this subsection (d-5) unless the hotel operator obtains the 20active Exemption Identification Number from the exclusively 21religious entity to whom it is renting and maintains that 22number in its books and records. Gross rental receipts from 23all rentals other than those described in items (1) or (2) of 24this subsection (d-5) are subject to the tax imposed by this 25Act unless otherwise exempt under this Act. 26    This subsection (d-5) is exempt from the sunset provisions   SB2430- 9 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1of Section 3-5 of this Act. 2    (d-10) On and after July 1, 2023, the tax imposed by this 3Act shall not apply to gross rental receipts received from the 4renting, leasing, or letting of rooms to an entity that is 5organized and operated exclusively by an organization 6chartered by the United States Congress for the purpose of 7providing disaster relief and that possesses an active 8Exemption Identification Number issued by the Department 9pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act if the renting, 10leasing, or letting of the rooms is in furtherance of the 11purposes for which the exempt organization is organized. This 12subsection (d-10) is exempt from the sunset provisions of 13Section 3-5 of this Act. 14    (e) Persons subject to the tax imposed by this Act may 15reimburse themselves for their tax liability under this Act by 16separately stating such tax as an additional charge, which 17charge may be stated in combination, in a single amount, with 18any tax imposed pursuant to Sections 8-3-13 and 8-3-14 of the 19Illinois Municipal Code, and Section 25.05-10 of "An Act to 20revise the law in relation to counties".21    (f) If any hotel operator collects an amount (however 22designated) which purports to reimburse such operator for 23hotel operators' occupation tax liability measured by receipts 24which are not subject to hotel operators' occupation tax, or 25if any hotel operator, in collecting an amount (however 26designated) which purports to reimburse such operator for   SB2430- 10 -LRB104 03189 HLH 13210 b1hotel operators' occupation tax liability measured by receipts 2which are subject to tax under this Act, collects more from the 3guest or re-renter than the operators' hotel operators' 4occupation tax liability in the transaction is, the guest or 5re-renter, as applicable, shall have a legal right to claim a 6refund of such amount from such operator. However, if such 7amount is not refunded to the guest or re-renter, as 8applicable, for any reason, the hotel operator is liable to 9pay such amount to the Department.10(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 7-1-24.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.